Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 3. Sale of Light Wine, Beer, and Other Alcoholic Beverages
§ 67-3-73.
Immunity from liability of persons who lawfully furnished or sold intoxicating beverages to one causing damage.

The Mississippi Legislature finds and declares that the consumption of intoxicating beverages, rather than the sale or serving or furnishing of such beverages, is the proximate cause of any injury, including death and property damage, inflicted by an intoxicated person upon himself or upon another person.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no holder of an alcoholic beverage, beer or light wine permit, or any agent or employee of such holder, who lawfully sells or serves intoxicating beverages to a person who may lawfully purchase such intoxicating beverages, shall be liable to such person or to any other person or to the estate, or survivors of either, for any injury suffered off the licensed premises, including wrongful death and property damage, because of the intoxication of the person to whom the intoxicating beverages were sold or served.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no social host who serves or furnishes any intoxicating beverage to a person who may lawfully consume such intoxicating beverage shall be liable to such person or to any other person or to the estate, or survivors of either, for any injury suffered off such social host’s premises, including wrongful death and property damage, because of the intoxication of the person to whom the intoxicating beverages were served or furnished. No social host who owns, leases or otherwise lawfully occupies a premises on which, in his absence and without his consent, intoxicating beverages are consumed by a person who may lawfully consume such intoxicating beverage shall be liable to such person or to any other person or to the estate, or survivors of either, for any injury suffered off the premises, including wrongful death and property damage, because of the intoxication of the person who consumed the intoxicating beverages.

The limitation of liability provided by this section shall not apply to any person who causes or contributes to the consumption of alcoholic beverages by force or by falsely representing that a beverage contains no alcohol, or to any holder of an alcoholic beverage, beer or light wine permit, or any agent or employee of such holder when it is shown that the person making a purchase of an alcoholic beverage was at the time of such purchase visibly intoxicated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 451, eff from and after April 3, 1987 (became law without Governor’s signature on April 3, 1987).

§ 67-3-74.
Enforcement of certain provisions by officers of the division.

In addition to peace officers within their jurisdiction, all enforcement officers of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue are authorized to enforce the provisions made unlawful by this chapter and Section 97-5-49; however, the provisions prohibiting the sale of light wine or beer to persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall be enforced by the division as provided for in this section.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall investigate violations of the laws prohibiting the sale of light wine or beer to persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years upon receipt of a complaint or information from a person stating that they have knowledge of such violation.

Upon receipt of such complaint or information, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall notify the permit holder of the complaint by certified mail to the primary business office of such permit holder or by hand delivery of the complaint or information to the primary business office of such holder, except in cases where the complaint or information is received from any law enforcement officer.

If an enforcement officer of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division enters the business of the holder of the permit to investigate a complaint and discovers a violation, the agent shall notify the person that committed the violation and the holder of the permit:

Within ten (10) days after such violation, Sundays and holidays excluded, if the business sells light wine or beer for on-premises consumption; and

Within seventy-two (72) hours after such violation, Sundays and holidays excluded, if the business does not sell light wine or beer for on-premises consumption.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 392, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 462, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 462, § 6; Laws, 2011, ch. 379, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 470, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 67-3-75.
Repealed.

Repealed by operation of law on July 1, 2000, by Laws, 1998, ch. 520, § 4.

[Laws, 1997, ch. 558, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 520, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998, and shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2000]